Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.10.058

College in the high school program—At no cost—Rate per college funding.

(1) Beginning on September 1, 2023, institutions of higher education must provide enrollment and registration in college in the high school courses in which a student is eligible to receive college credit available at no cost for students in the ninth, 10th, 11th, or 12th grade at public high schools.

(2) Beginning with the 2023-2025 omnibus operating appropriations act, the legislature must pass an omnibus operating appropriations act that appropriates to the state board of community and technical colleges and each of the public four-year institutions of higher education state funding for college in high school courses administered at public secondary schools.

(3) State appropriations for the college in the high school program to the institutions of higher education shall be calculated as follows: The total college in the high school courses administered in the prior academic year, funded at $300 per student up to a maximum rate of:

(a) $6,000 per college in the high school course administered by a state university as defined in RCW 28B.10.016;

(b) $5,000 per college in the high school course administered by a regional university or the state college; or

(c) $3,500 per college in the high school course administered by a community or technical college.

(4) Beginning with fiscal year 2025 the rate per college in the high school course administered must be adjusted annually for inflation as measured by the consumer price index.

(5) State appropriations must be based on the total number of college in the high school courses administered by an institution of higher education for the academic year immediately prior to the current fiscal year. The state appropriation is based on course administration data submitted annually by October 15th to the office of financial management and legislative fiscal staff.

(6) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this section unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(a) "Community or technical college" has the same meaning as provided for under RCW 28B.50.030.

(b) "Course" means a class taught under a contract between an institution of higher education and a single high school teacher on an articulated subject in which the student is eligible to receive college credit.

(c) "High school" means a public school, as defined in RCW 28A.150.010, that serves students in any of grades nine through 12.

(d) "Institutions of higher education" has the same meaning as provided for under RCW 28B.10.016.

(e) "College in the high school" is the program created under RCW 28A.600.287.

[ 2023 c 314 s 1.]